zh-CN: 卡片活页夹页类型: 固定内页（不可补充）; 磁扣内页; 活页环内页（可补充）; 侧入式; 顶入式; 拉链内页; 其他
da: Type af kortbindersider: Faste sider (kan ikke genopfyldes); Sider med magnetlukning; Ringbindssider (kan genopfyldes); Indsætning fra siden; Indsætning fra toppen; Sider med lynlås; Andet
tr: Kart klasörü sayfa tipi: Sabit sayfalar (sayfa eklenemez); Manyetik tokalı sayfalar; Halkalı klasör sayfaları (sayfa eklenebilir); Yandan yüklemeli; Üstten yüklemeli; Fermuarlı sayfalar; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta strani mape za shranjevanje kartic: Fiksne strani (brez možnosti polnjenja); Strani z magnetno zaponko; Strani z obročki (možnost polnjenja); Stransko vstavljanje; Zgornje vstavljanje; Strani z zadrgo; Drugo
fr: Type de pages de classeur à cartes: Pages fixes (non rechargeables); Pages à fermoir magnétique; Pages pour classeur à anneaux (rechargeables); Chargement latéral; Chargement par le haut; Pages à fermeture éclair; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de página do dossier para cartas: Páginas fixas (não recarregáveis); Páginas com fecho magnético; Páginas para dossiê (recarregáveis); Carregamento lateral; Carregamento pelo topo; Páginas com fecho de correr; Outras
pt-BR: Tipo de página do fichário: Páginas fixas (não recarregáveis); Páginas com fecho magnético; Páginas de fichário com argolas (recarregáveis); Carregamento lateral; Carregamento superior; Páginas com zíper; Outro
en: Card binder page type: Fixed pages (non-refillable); Magnetic clasp pages; Ring binder pages (refillable); Side-loading; Top-loading; Zippered pages; Other
ja: カードバインダーのページタイプ: 固定ページ (補充不可); マグネットクラスプページ; リングバインダーページ (補充可能); サイドローディング; トップローディング; ジッパー付きページ; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta stranice za mapiranje kartica: Fiksne stranice (bez mogućnosti dodavanja); Stranice s magnetskom kopčom; Stranice za registrator (s mogućnošću dodavanja); Umetanje sa strane; Umetanje s gornje strane; Stranice s patentnim zatvaračem; Ostalo
cs: Typ stránek do pořadače na karty: Pevné stránky (nedoplnitelné); Stránky s magnetickým zavíráním; Kroužková vazba (doplnitelná); Vkládání ze strany; Vkládání shora; Zapínání na zip; Jiné
hu: Kártyagyűjtő mappa laptípusa: Rögzített lapok (nem újratölthető); Mágneszáras lapok; Gyűrűs mappa lapok (újratölthető); Oldalról betölthető; Felülről betölthető; Cipzáras lapok; Egyéb
ru: Тип страниц папки для карточек: Фиксированные страницы (без возможности добавления); Страницы на магнитной застежке; Страницы на кольцах (сменные); С боковой загрузкой; С верхней загрузкой; Страницы на молнии; Другое
vi: Loại trang bìa đựng thẻ: Trang cố định (không thể nạp lại); Trang gắn nam châm; Trang bìa còng (có thể nạp lại); Nạp từ hông; Nạp từ trên; Trang có khóa kéo; Khác
fi: Korttikansion sivutyyppi: Kiinteät sivut (ei täytettävä); Magneettikiinnityksellä varustetut sivut; Rengaskansiosivut (täytettävä); Sivulta täytettävä; Päältä täytettävä; Vetoketjulliset sivut; Muu
ko: 카드 바인더 페이지 유형: 고정형 페이지(리필 불가); 자석 클래스프 페이지; 링 바인더 페이지(리필 가능); 사이드 로딩; 탑 로딩; 지퍼형 페이지; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de pagină pentru bibliorafturi de carduri: Pagini fixe (nereîncărcabile); Pagini cu închidere magnetică; Pagini cu inele (reîncărcabile); Încărcare laterală; Încărcare superioară; Pagini cu fermoar; Altele
th: รูปแบบหน้าของแฟ้มเก็บไพ่: หน้าคงที่ (เติมไม่ได้); หน้าแบบแม่เหล็ก; แบบห่วง (เติมได้); ใส่จากด้านข้าง; ใส่จากด้านบน; หน้าแบบมีซิป; อื่นๆ
sv: Kortpärmens sidtyp: Fasta sidor (ej påfyllningsbar); Sidor med magnetlås; Pärmsidor (påfyllningsbar); Sidoladdad; Toppladdad; Sidor med dragkedja; Annat
it: Tipo di pagina del raccoglitore di schede: Pagine fisse (non ricaricabili); Pagine con chiusura magnetica; Pagine ad anelli (ricaricabili); Inserimento laterale; Inserimento dall'alto; Pagine con cerniera; Altro
pl: Typ stron albumu na karty: Strony stałe (bez możliwości uzupełniania); Strony z zamknięciem magnetycznym; Strony na kółkach (możliwość uzupełniania); Ładowane z boku; Ładowane od góry; Strony zapinane na zamek; Inne
el: Τύπος σελίδας ντοσιέ κάρτας: Σταθερές σελίδες (χωρίς δυνατότητα αναπλήρωσης); Σελίδες με μαγνητικό κούμπωμα; Σελίδες ντοσιέ με κρίκους (με δυνατότητα αναπλήρωσης); Πλευρικής τοποθέτησης; Επάνω τοποθέτησης; Σελίδες με φερμουάρ; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип страници за класьор с карти: Фиксирани страници (без презареждане); Страници с магнитна закопчалка; Страници за папки с халки (с презареждане); Със странично поставяне; С горно поставяне; Страници с цип; Друго
nl: Kaart map type pagina: Vaste pagina's (niet navulbaar); Pagina's met magnetische sluiting; Ringbandpagina's (navulbaar); Side-loading; Top-loading; Pagina's met rits; Overige
es: Tipo de páginas para guardar de cartas: Páginas fijas (no recargables); Páginas con cierre magnético; Páginas de carpetas de anillas (recargables); Carga lateral; Carga superior; Páginas con cremallera; Otro
nb: Sidetype for kortperm: Faste sider (kan ikke fylles på); Sider med magnetlås; Ringpermsider (kan fylles på); Innsetting fra siden; Innsetting fra toppen; Sider med glidelås; Annet
de: Art der Sammelordnerseiten: Feste Seiten (nicht nachfüllbar); Seiten mit Magnetverschluss; Ringbuchseiten (nachfüllbar); Side-Loading; Top-Loading; Seiten mit Reißverschluss; Sonstige
zh-TW: 卡片活頁夾頁面類型: 固定內頁 (不可補充); 磁吸式內頁; 活頁環內頁 (可補充); 側裝式; 頂裝式; 拉鍊式內頁; 其他
lt-LT: Kortelių segtuvo puslapių tipas: Fiksuoti puslapiai (nepildomas); Puslapiai su magnetiniu užsegimu; Segtuvo puslapiai (pildomas); Pildoma iš šono; Pildoma iš viršaus; Puslapiai su užtrauktuku; Kita
sk-SK: Typ stránok zakladača kariet: Pevné strany (bez možnosti doplnenia); Strany s magnetickým uzáverom; Krúžková väzba (s možnosťou doplnenia); Plnenie zboku; Plnenie zhora; Strany so zipsom; Iné